Hawaii statutes.
§432:2-107 Purposes and powers. (a) A
society shall operate for the benefit of members and their beneficiaries by:

(1) Providing benefits as specified in section
432:2-401; and

(2) Operating for one or more lawful, social,
intellectual, educational, charitable, benevolent, moral, fraternal, patriotic
or religious purposes for the benefit of its members, which may also be
extended to others.

Such purposes may be carried out directly by the
society, or indirectly through subsidiary corporations or affiliated
organizations.

(b) Every society shall have the power to
adopt laws and rules for the government of the society, the admission of its
members, and the management of its affairs. It shall have the power to change,
alter, add to or amend such laws and rules and shall have such other powers as
are necessary and incidental to carrying into effect the objects and purposes
of the society. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next